Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,107
Immunity from liability.

Any physician or pharmacist required to make reports under section 81-6,102 or 81-6,103 is immune from liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, for filing an incomplete report as a result of the failure of an individual to provide the information necessary to make such report.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 15;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 23.